lt-LT: Iškirptė: Asimetrinė; Atviri pečiai; Laivelis; Laisva; Aukšta; Segama per kaklą; Su gobtuvu; Su apykakle; Aukšta apykakle; Gili; Apvali; Su skeltuku; Kvadratinė; Širdelės formos; Su kaklu; V formos; Susiaučiama; Kita
vi: Đường viền cổ áo: Lệch; Trễ vai; Thuyền; Mũ trùm đầu; Tròn cao; Yếm; Mũ trùm; Tàu; Cổ lọ thấp; V sâu; Mũi giày tròn; Tóc chẻ ngọn; Mũi giày vuông; Cúp ngực trái tim; Cổ lọ; Cổ chữ V; Vạt đắp chéo; Khác
sk-SK: Výstrih: Asymetrický; Bardot; Námornícky; Kuklový; Bezgoliérový; Halter; S kapucňou; Mandarínsky; Mock; Hlboký výstrih; Okrúhly; Split; Hranatý; Sweetheart; Rolák; Výstrih do V; Wrap; Iné
da: Halsudskæring: Asymmetrisk; Bardot; Båd; Cowl; Crew; Halter; Hætte; Mandarin; Mock; Stupende; Rund; Splittet; Firkant; Sweetheart; Turtle; V-hals; Wrap; Andet
ko: 네크라인: 비대칭; 바르도; 보트; 카울; 크루; 홀터; 후드; 만다린; 모크; 플런징; 라운드; 스플릿; 스퀘어; 스위트하트; 터틀; V넥; 랩; 기타
sv: Halsringning: Asymmetrisk; Bardot; Båt; Kåpa; Besättning; Halter; Huva; Mandarin; Ståkrage; Djup; Rund; Kluvet; Fyrkantig; Utskuren; Polokrage; V-ringad; Omlott; Övrigt
ru: Вырез горловины: Асимметричный; Бардо; Лодочка; Клоубук; Хомут; С бретелькой через шею; С капюшоном; Мандарин; Ложе; Глубокий; Круглый; Разделенный; Квадратный; Сердцевидный; Черепаха; V-образный вырез; Накидка; Другой
hr-HR: Izrez: Asimetrični; Otvorena ramena; Lađa; Padajući; Uski; Halter; S kapuljačom; Mandarinski; Kratki; Duboki; Okrugli; Podijeljeni; Kvadratni; Sweetheart; Dolčevita; V-izrez; Na preklop; Ostalo
es: Cuello: Asimétrico; Bardot; Barco; Cuello drapeado; Cuello redondo; Halter; Con capucha; Cuello mao; Cuello falso; Escote pronunciado; Redondo; Dividido; Cuadrado; Escote corazón; Cuello de tortuga; Escote en V; Cruzada; Otros
it: Scollatura: Asimmetrico; Bardot; Barca; A cappuccio; A girocollo; All’americana; Con cappuccio; Alla coreana; Lupetto; Profondo; Rotonda; Rovinati; Quadrata; A cuore; Dolcevita; Scollo a V; A portafoglio; Altro
pl: Dekolt: Asymetryczna; Bardot; Łódź; Zakładany przez głowę; Zespół; Kantar; Zakapturzony; mandaryński; Tymczasowa; Wgłębny; Runda; Split; Kwadrat; Skarb; Żółwie; Dekolt w serek; Owijana; Inne
de: Ausschnitt: Asymmetrisch; Bardot; Boot; Wasserfall; Rundhals; Nackenträger; Mit Kapuze; Mandarin; Stehkragen; Tiefes Dekolleté; Rund; Splissig; Quadrat; Herzförmig; Schildkröte; V-Ausschnitt; Wickel; Sonstiges
nb: Halskant: Asymmetrisk; Bardot; Båt; Hette; Rund hals; Halter; Hette; Mandarin; Mock; Utringning; Rund; Splitt; Firkantet; Sweetheart; Turtleneck; V-hals; Innpakning; Annet
nl: Halslijn: Asymmetrisch; Bardot; Boot; Kap; Ronde hals; Halter; Met capuchon; Mandarin; Staand; Plunge; Rond; Gespleten; Vierkant; Hartvorming decolleté; Schildpad; V-hals; Wikkel; Andere
pt-BR: Decote: Assimétrico; Ombro a ombro; Barco; Pescoço de capuz; Gola redonda; Com alça; Com capuz; Gola mandarim; Colete; Tomara que caia; Redondo; Ponta dupla; Quadrado; Gola coração; Gola alta; Decote em V; Abertura frontal; Outro
cs: Výstřih: Asymetrický; Bardotka; Loď; Límcový; Posádkový; Půlkulatý; S kapucí; Mandarinský; Rolákový; Hluboký; Oválná; Rozdělené; Čtvercová; Srdcový; Želví; Výstřih do V; Zavinovací; Jiné
ja: ネックライン: アシンメトリー; バルドー; ボート; カウル; クルー; ホルター; フード; マンダリン; モック; プランジング; ラウンド; 枝毛; スクエア; スイートハート; タートル; Vネック; ラップ; その他
fi: Pääntie: Epäsymmetrinen; Bardot; Vene; Huppu; Pyöreä; Niskalenkki; Hupullinen; Mandariini; Pystykaulus; Riippuva; Pyöreä; Kaksihaaraiset; Neliömäinen; Sweetheart; Poolokaulus; V-aukko; Kietaisu; Muu
pt-PT: Decote: Decote assimétrico; Decote bardot; Barco; Capuz; Gola redonda; Decote com alças; Com capuz; Gola mandarin; Gola subida; Decote aberto; Redondo; Quebradiço; Quadrado; Decote em coração; Gola alta; Decote em V; Gola de enrolar; Outro
zh-CN: 领口: 不对称; 芭铎领线; 船型; 围脖; 水手领口; 吊带领口; 连帽; 中式领口; 半高领; 低胸领; 圆头; 分叉; 方形; 鸡心领口; 龟形领; V 领; 围裹式半身裙; 其他
el: Ντεκολτέ: Ασύμμετρη; Bardot; Βάρκα; Γιακάς; Crew; Halter; Με κουκούλα; Μάο; Mock; Βαθειά; Στρογγυλό; ΔιαχωρισμένοΣπλιτ; Τετράγωνο; Sweetheart; Ζιβάγκο; Λαιμόκοψη V; Γυριστό; Άλλο
en: Neckline: Asymmetric; Bardot; Boat; Cowl; Crew; Halter; Hooded; Mandarin; Mock; Plunging; Round; Split; Square; Sweetheart; Turtle; V-neck; Wrap; Other
tr: Yaka Çizgisi: Asimetrik; Bardot; Bot; Kukuleta; Mürettebat; Halter; Kukuletalı; Mandarin; Sahte; Dalma; Yuvarlak; Kırık; Kare; Kalp; Kaplumbağa; V yaka; sarma; Diğer
fr: Décolleté: Asymétrique; Bardot; Bateau; Double; Rond; Halter; Encapuchonné; Mao; Montant; Plongeant; Rond; Fourchus; Carré; En cœur; Tortue; Col en V; Cache-cœur; Autre
ro-RO: Guler: Asimetric; Bardot; Bărcuță; Drapat; La baza gâtului; Halter; Hooded; Mandarin; Mock; Decolteu adânc; Rotund; Despicat; Pătrat; Sub formă de inimă; Guler înalt rulat; Decolteu în V; Petrecut; Altele
sl-SI: Vratni izrez: Asimetrična; Bardot; Ladijski; Nabran; Okrogel; Zožen okoli vratu; S kapuco; Mandarin ovratnik; Visok ovratnik; Globok; Okrogel; Z razporkom; Kvadraten; Srčast; Puli; V-izrez; Ovito; Drugo
bg-BG: Деколте: Асиметрично; Бардо; Лодка; Качулка; Изрязано; Огърлица; С качулка; Мандарин; Макет; Дълбоко; Кръгъл; Сплит; Квадратен; Любовно; Костенурка; V-образно; Обвиващо; Други
hu: Dekoltázs: Aszimmetrikus; Bardot; Csónak; Kámzsa; Crew; Nyakpántos; Kapucnis; Kínai; Mock; Mély; Kerek; Osztott; Szögletes; Szív alakú; Garbó; V-nyakú; Átlapolt; Egyéb
th: คอเสื้อ: ไม่สมมาตร; เปิดไหล่; เรือขนาดเล็ก; Cowl; คอกลม; คล้องคอ; มีฮู้ด; คอจีน; คอปีน; คอลึก; ทรงกลม; ผมแตกปลาย; ทรงเหลี่ยม; คอรูปหัวใจ; คอเต่า; คอวี; Wrap; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 領口: 不對稱; 開領; 船; 重褶領; 圓式衣領; 繞頸式; 連帽領口; 立領; 小高領; 深 V 領; 圓頭; 分叉; 方頭; 心形領口; 海龜; V 字領; 圍脖; 其他